Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Purpose 
The purpose of this act is to align the legal gambling age with the age of adulthood, 
granting individuals 18 years of age the same rights and responsibilities as other legal adults in 
the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. Additionally, this act aims to increase state revenue by 
keeping gambling-related spending within Massachusetts, preventing the loss of economic 
activity to neighboring states such as New Hampshire, Rhode Island, and Connecticut, where 
individuals under 21 can legally gamble. 
SECTION 2. Amendment to Gambling Age Laws 
(a) Chapter 23K, Section 45 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking the word 
“twenty-one (21)” wherever it appears and inserting in place thereof the word “eighteen (18).” 

of 3 11  (b) Any other applicable laws or regulations setting the minimum gambling age at 21 
shall be amended accordingly to reflect the new legal age of 18. 
SECTION 3. Encouraging Responsible Gambling 
(a) The Massachusetts Gaming Commission shall develop and implement educational 
programs targeting young adults to promote responsible gambling habits. 
(b) All licensed gambling establishments must provide information on problem gambling 
resources, including the Massachusetts Council on Gaming and Health. 
(c) A portion of gambling tax revenue shall be allocated to programs that support 
gambling addiction prevention and treatment. 
SECTION 4. Rights and Responsibilities 
Individuals aged 18 and older shall be granted the legal right to engage in legal gambling 
activities within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. They shall also be subject to all penalties 
and liabilities associated with these activities. 
SECTION 5. Effective Date 
This act shall take effect 60 days after its passage. 
SECTION 6. Severability 
If any provision of this act or its application is found to be invalid, such invalidity shall 
not affect other provisions or applications of the act, which shall remain in full force and effect. 

of 3 29  Now, each bill stands independently for separate consideration. Let me know if you need 
any revisions.